Wyoming, session 2026, SF0023.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 25-10-110(e) is amended to read:
25-10-110. Involuntary hospitalization proceedings.
(e) The court shall appoint one (1) or more examiners
to examine the proposed patient and to make a written
report to the court of the findings as to the history and
mental illness of the proposed patient. The court may order
the proposed patient to appear for examination and if the
proposed patient does not appear the court may compel his
appearance. The examination shall be held at a hospital, a
medical facility, the home of the proposed patient or any
other suitable place which will not have a harmful effect
on his the patient's health. The examination shall be
conducted no later than seven (7) days from the date of the
notice. If the examination is conducted by an examiner
other than a licensed physician, a licensed psychiatrist, a
licensed advanced practice registered nurse, a licensed
physician assistant or a licensed psychologist, the court
shall appoint one (1) of the following persons, a licensed
physician, a licensed psychiatrist, a licensed
psychiatric‑mental health nurse practitioner, a licensed
physician assistant with documented education, training and
experience in psychiatric or mental health assessment and
diagnosis or a licensed psychologist to review the findings
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0023
ENROLLED ACT NO. 60, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
of the examiner and conduct a further examination, if
indicated, and to report to the court.
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2